Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB880.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 313 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. PURPOSE.
This Compact shall be known as the Interstate Dental and Dental Hygiene Licensure
Compact and the purpose of the Compact is to expedite licensure and increase access
to dental health care through licensure boards acting in cooperation. The Compact
adopts the existing structures most utilized by dental boards across the United States,
while ensuring the safety of the public through the sharing of documents and
information. This Compact ensures that each state retains the right to impose an
adverse action on a licensee as a home state or as a practicing state. Each state has an
opportunity to share investigations and information with the home state of licensure.
The Compact is operated by state dental board members, administrators, and other
staff, thus allowing for each state to maintain its sovereignty. The Compact:
(a) Allows for expedited licensure portability and ease of movement of licensees
between states;
(b) Allows each state to continue to regulate the practice of dentistry and dental
hygiene within its borders;
(c) Creates a common goal of protecting the public by ensuring a uniform licensure
standard and sharing of information in the Compact;
(d) Allows for licensure in every participating state by requiring passage of the
uniform licensure examination that assesses psychomotor and cognitive dental
skills and is currently accepted in fifty (50) state licensing jurisdictions and
United States territories;
(e) Gives licensees one (1) location to maintain professional documentation to
expedite license transfers in states, hospitals, or institutional credentialing;
Page 1 of 22
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2483
(f) Facilitates a faster licensure process for relocation or separation of military
members and their dependent spouses; there are no compact fees for military
members or their spouses;
(g) Alleviates a duplicative process for licensure among multiple states; and
(h) Saves applicants money by not having to obtain duplicate documents from a
source that charges for the documents.
Section 2. DEFINITIONS
As used in this compact, and except as otherwise provided, the following definitions
shall apply:
(a) "AADB" means the American Association of Dental Boards (AADB) or its
named successor, formerly known as the American Association of Dental
Examiners (AADE), originally chartered on September 10, 1896, and renewed in
1944, comprised of state dental boards in the United States and its territories;
(b) "Attorneys’ Committee" means the committee of attorneys who currently
represent a member state dental board. The Attorneys’ Committee shall designate
one (1) of its members to participate in the commission as a nonvoting member.
An attorney that has previously served as an attorney for a member state dental
board may be invited on a year-to-year basis to serve on the Attorneys’ Committee
if they have not engaged in an official case against a state dental board or have
any other conflict of interest. The Attorneys’ Committee may assist the
investigators in working through joint investigation issues between states;
(c) "Active duty military person or spouse" means a licensee in full-time active-duty
status in the active uniformed services of the United States, including members of
the National Guard and Reserves. The legal spouse of the military member must
be recognized by the military unit as a dependent while the service member is on
active duty. Spouses shall receive the same privileges as military members for the
purpose of this Compact;
Page 2 of 22
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2483
(d) "Active investigation" means an active investigation potentially resulting in
formal allegations or charges precipitating a judicial process by a state dental
board, oversight agency, or other law enforcement entity;
(e) "Adverse action" means an order issued by a state dental board or reported to the
clearinghouse pursuant to the commission’s bylaws and rules that disciplines a
licensee. Adverse action includes, and is not limited to, the suspension, limiting,
or revocation of a license or compact license privilege; the imposition of fees and
sanctions; and any temporary emergency order that may be later withdrawn by a
board;
(f) "ADEX examination" means the initial licensure examinations developed by the
American Board of Dental Examiners, Inc. or its successor;
(g) "Bylaws" means the bylaws passed by the commission or its named successor
commission;
(h) "Clearinghouse" means the clearinghouse and databank that houses prior
adverse action documentations, orders and denials of licensure or permits from
state dental boards that is administered by the AADB or its successor;
(i) "CODA" means the Commission on Dental Accreditation or its successor as
approved by the United States Department of Education;
(j) "Commission" means the Interstate Dental and Dental Hygiene Compact
Licensure Commission created pursuant to Section 3 of this Compact.
(k) "Commissioners" means the two (2) members chosen by each member state
dental board to serve as the voting members of the commission;
(l) "Compact" means the Interstate Dental and Dental Hygiene Licensure Compact
created pursuant to Section 3 of this Compact;
(m) "Compact license privilege" means the expedited dental or dental hygiene license
to practice in a member state that is not the licensee’s home state;
(n) "Conviction" means an adjudication or formal judgment by a court that an
Page 3 of 22
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2483
individual is guilty through a plea of guilty or no contest, or a finding of guilt by
the court. Evidence of a conviction of a criminal offense by the court shall be
considered final for the purposes of considering or imposing disciplinary action
by a member state dental board;
(o) "Criminal background check" means a criminal background check using the
results of fingerprint or other biometric data checks compliant with the
requirements of the Federal Bureau of Investigation, with the exception of
federal employees who have suitability determination in accordance with 5 C.F.R.
sec. 731.202;
(p) "Dental hygienist" means any person who:
1. Has successfully graduated from a CODA-approved dental hygiene school;
2. Has successfully passed the ADEX dental hygiene licensure examination;
or has been in practice five (5) years or more and has successfully passed a
regional board examination or equivalent state-administered psychomotor
licensure examination prior to January 1, 2024;
3. Has successfully passed the written national dental hygiene board
examination administered by the Joint Commission on National Dental
Examinations;
4. Possesses a full and unrestricted dental hygiene license issued by a member
state;
5. Has never been convicted or received adjudication, deferred adjudication,
community supervision, or deferred disposition for any offense other than
traffic offenses by a court of appropriate jurisdiction;
6. Has never been a subject of discipline by a licensing agency through any
adverse action, order, or other restriction of the licensee by a licensing
agency, with the exception of failure to pay fees or failure to complete
continuing education;
Page 4 of 22
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2483
7. Is not currently under active investigation by a licensing agency or law
enforcement authority in any state, federal or foreign jurisdiction; and
8. Meets any jurisprudence requirement established by a member state dental
board of a member state in which a licensee is seeking a compact license
privilege;
(q) "Dental practice act" means the laws and regulations governing the practice of
dentistry within a member state;
(r) "Dentist" means any person who:
1. Has successfully graduated from a CODA-approved dental school;
2. Has successfully passed the ADEX dental licensure exam; or has been in
practice five (5) years or more and has successfully passed a regional board
examination or equivalent state-administered psychomotor licensure
examination prior to January 1, 2024;
3. Has successfully passed the written national dental board exam
administered by the Joint Commission on National Dental Examinations;
4. Possesses a full and unrestricted dental license issued by a member state
dental board;
5. Has never been convicted or received adjudication, deferred adjudication,
community supervision, or deferred disposition for any offense other than
traffic offenses by a court of appropriate jurisdiction;
6. Has never been a subject of discipline by a licensing agency through any
adverse action, order, or other restriction of the licensee by a licensing
agency, with the exception of failure to pay fees or failure to complete
continuing education;
7. Has never had a state or federal drug registration, permit, or license
restricted, suspended, or revoked by the United States Drug Enforcement
Administration or any licensing agency that oversees scheduled drug
Page 5 of 22
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2483
registrations;
8. Is not currently under active investigation by a licensing agency or law
enforcement authority in any state, federal or foreign jurisdiction; and
9. Meets any jurisprudence requirement established by a member state dental
board in which a licensee is seeking a compact license privilege;
(s) "Home state" means the state of primary licensure of a licensee;
(t) "License" means the authorization by a licensing authority for a dentist or dental
hygienist to engage in the unrestricted practice of dentistry or dental hygiene,
which would be unlawful without such license;
(u) "Licensee" means a dentist or dental hygienist who holds an unrestricted license
to practice as a dentists or dental hygienist;
(v) "Licensing agency" means the agency or other entity of a state that is responsible
for the licensing of dentists and dental hygienists. If a member state dental board
has such responsibility, it shall be deemed a licensing agency;
(w) "Member state dental board" means a state agency in a member state that
protects the public through licensure, regulation, and the education of dentists
and dental hygienists, as directed by the state law. All actions taken by a member
state dental board shall be under the authority of the laws of its state and any
other rights conferred under this Compact;
(x) "Member state" means a state, the District of Colombia or any other United
States territory that has enacted this Compact;
(y) "Regional board examination" means initial licensure examinations
administered by the Western Regional Examining Board (WREB), the North East
Regional Board of Dental Examiners (NERB), the Commission on Dental
Competency Assessments (CDCA), Council of Interstate Testing Agencies
(CITA), Southern Regional Testing Agency (SRTA), or Central Regional Dental
Testing Services (CRDTS) that assess psychomotor skills;
Page 6 of 22
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2483
(z) "Repository" means the repository of original documents of a licensee that may
include original transcripts, certification documents, test scores, military training
records, previous or current licensing documents and other sources of materials
needed for applications and verification administered by the AADB or its
successor. The repository shall receive documents from primary or originating
sources and/or verify their authenticity;
(aa) "Scope of practice" means the dental-related procedures that require a license,
permit, or training, to undertake the treatment and procedure to be completed on
a patient within the member state’s requirements;
(bb) "State" means a state within the United States or a United States territory; and
(cc) "State jurisprudence" means the knowledge of a member state’s laws and rules
of dentistry and dental hygiene.
Section 3. COMPACT AND COMMISSION
(a) The member states hereby create the Interstate Dental and Dental Hygiene
Licensure Compact and the commission. Each member state must enact a
compact that is not materially different from this Compact, as determined by the
commission.
(b) Each member state dental board shall have two (2) voting members who shall
serve as commissioners. Each commissioner shall have one (1) vote. Member
states with separate dental and dental hygiene licensing agencies shall appoint
one (1) commissioner from each licensing agency. One (1) commissioner shall be
a current member of a member state dental board. Commissioners may not
delegate votes or vote by proxy, however, if a commissioner is unable to attend,
the member state may substitute a commissioner who meets the same
requirements.
(c) Upon five (5) states joining the Compact, the Compact shall become active. The
commission shall adopt bylaws upon becoming active.
Page 7 of 22
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2483
(d) The commission shall meet at least once per calendar year, the annual meeting
and at additional times as necessary pursuant to the bylaws and rules.
(e) At each annual meeting, the commission shall elect a chair, vice chair, secretary,
and treasurer from the membership of the commission, as the officers. The
officers shall be members of the commission’s executive committee. The
commission shall also elect representatives from four (4) regional districts
established by the commission to serve on the executive committee. All officers
and executive committee representatives shall serve one (1) year terms.
(f) Quorum for purposes of conducting business shall be a majority of
commissioners attending in person or virtually.
(g) The commission shall provide notice of all meetings on its website and in other
communications to member state dental boards.
(h) A vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the commissioners present shall be required for an
executive session to discuss:
(1) Items specifically related to participation in a lawsuit or in anticipation of a
legal proceeding;
(2) Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal statute;
(3) Information or matters involving law enforcement agencies or information
that accuses a person of a crime or a public censure;
(4) Discussions that would include information of a personal nature that would
constitute an unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
(5) Anything considered internal practices and procedures or a trade secret;
(6) Other items described in the commission bylaws allowing for executive
sessions to be called; or
(7) Advice of legal counsel.
(i) The commission shall keep minutes and make them available to all member
states.
Page 8 of 22
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2483
(j) The commission may establish other committees as needed.
(k) The commission shall prepare an annual report that shall be made available to
the legislatures and governors of the member states. The annual report shall
describe the activities of the commission during the preceding calendar year.
Such reports shall also include reports of the annual financial audit and any
actions taken by or rules that were adopted by the commission.
Section 4. DUTIES OF COMPACT MEMBER STATES
(a) Member states shall submit to the clearinghouse all member state dental board
actions and other documents and data as determined by the commission.
(b) Member states shall notify the commission of any adverse action taken by the
member state dental board, any active investigation by the member state dental
board, any active investigation involving pending criminal charges, or other
circumstance as determined by the commission.
(c) Any adverse action, order, restriction or denial of a license or permit on a
licensee or compact license privilege holder shall be reported to the clearinghouse
by the member state dental board.
(d) Member state dental boards may submit to the clearinghouse nonpublic
complaints, or disciplinary or investigatory information not required by Section
4(c) of this Compact. All investigatory material shall be considered confidential
and not part of a public record unless otherwise specifically required by state
statute.
(e) Members states shall accept continuing education credits as required or
recognized by any other member state.
(f) Documents in the repository shall be treated by a member state as the equivalent
of a primary or original source document for licensure.
(g) Member states shall accept a standardized application for a compact license
privilege. The standardized application shall be established by the rules enacted
Page 9 of 22
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2483
by the commission.
(h) Member states may agree to share information regarding ongoing investigations
and actions, including joint investigations between states. All investigatory
material shall be considered confidential and not part of a public record unless
otherwise specifically required by state statute.
(i) As part of the Compact enforcement, participating member states may issue
subpoenas and seek testimony of witnesses, which subpoenas shall be enforced in
other member states and enforced by a court of competent jurisdiction where the
witnesses or evidence is located.
Section 5. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE COMMISSION
(a) The commission shall have the duty and power to:
(1) Oversee and maintain the administration of the Compact, including the
organizational needs, the financial activities, the hiring of personnel and
ongoing activities or needs of the commission;
(2) Promulgate bylaws and rules to operate the Compact and the commission;
(3) Establish a budget and make expenditures;
(4) Have an annual financial audit performed by an independent certified
public accounting firm;
(5) Issue, upon the request of a member state dental board, advisory opinions
concerning the meaning or interpretation of the Compact and its bylaws,
rules, and actions;
(6) Enforce compliance with Compact provisions, the rules promulgated by the
commission, and the bylaws, using all necessary and proper means,
including but not limited to the use of judicial process;
(7) Hold an annual meeting for the commission where the elections of the
executive committee and other issues may be discussed and voted on;
(8) Establish personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest,
Page 10 of 22
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2483
and the rates of compensation and qualifications of personnel;
(9) Accept donations and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and
services, and to receive, utilize, and dispose of them in a manner consistent
with the conflict of interest policies established by the commission;
(10) Report annually to the legislatures and governors of the member state
dental boards concerning the activities of the commission during the
preceding calendar year. Such reports shall also include reports of annual
financial audits, all actions of the commission, rules adopted by the
commission, and any recommendations by the commission; and
(11) Coordinate education, training and public awareness regarding the
Compact, its implementation, and its operation.
(b) The executive committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the commission,
with the exception of rulemaking, during periods when the commission is not in
session. When acting on behalf of the commission, the executive committee shall
oversee the administration of the Compact, including enforcement of and
compliance with the Compact.
(c) The officers and employees of the commission shall be immune from suit and
liability, either personally or in their official capacity, for a claim for damage to
or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability caused or arising out
of, or relating to, an actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred, or that
such person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred, within the scope of
commission employment, duties or responsibilities; provided, that such person
shall not be protected from suit or liability for damage, loss, injury or liability
caused by the intentional or willful and wanton misconduct of such person.
(d) The liability of the executive director and employees of the commission or
representatives of the commission, acting within the scope of such person's
employment or duties for acts, errors or omissions occurring within such person's
Page 11 of 22
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2483
state may not exceed the limits of liability set forth under the constitution and
laws of that state for state officials, employees, and agents. The commission shall
be considered to be an instrumentality of the states for the purposes of any such
action. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to protect such person from
suit or liability for damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional or
willful and wanton misconduct of such person.
(e) The commission shall defend the commission’s executive director, its employees,
and, subject to the approval of the attorney general or other appropriate legal
counsel of the member state represented by a commission representative, shall
defend such commission representative in any civil action seeking to impose
liability arising out of an actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred
within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities, or that the
defendant had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of
commission employment, duties or responsibilities, provided that the actual or
alleged act, error or omission did not result from intentional or willful and
wanton misconduct on the part of such person.
(f) To the extent not covered by the state involved, member state, or the commission,
the representatives or employees of the commission shall be held harmless by the
commission in the amount of a settlement or judgment, including attorney's fees
and costs, obtained against such persons arising out of an actual or alleged act,
error or omission that occurred within the scope of commission employment,
duties or responsibilities, or that such persons had a reasonable basis for
believing occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties, or
responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error or omission did not
result from intentional or willful and wanton misconduct on the part of such
persons.
Section 6. APPLICATION, ELIGIBILITY, AND ISSUANCE OF COMPACT
Page 12 of 22
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2483
LICENSE PRIVILEGE TO A MEMBER STATE
(a) A dentist or dental hygienist applying for compact license privileges shall meet
the requirements of a dentist as listed in Section (2)(r) of this Compact or a dental
hygienist as listed in Section (2)(p) of this Compact and hold a current license in
a member state under this Compact.
(b) Each dentist or dental hygienist shall designate a home state of licensure. The
home state shall be determined by:
(1) The state of primary residence for the dentist or dental hygienist, where
twenty-five percent (25%) of their practice within one (1) year occurs. An
active duty military member or their spouse may choose a home state as
designated with the military but are not required to meet the requirement of
twenty-five percent (25%) practice being within their home state; or
(2) If no state qualifies under Section 6(b)(1) of this Compact, then the state
that the dentist or dental hygienist listed as their state of residence on the
previous year’s federal tax return.
(c) A dentist or dental hygienist may redesignate a home state no more than one (1)
time in a calendar year if the qualifications of a home state are met.
(d) A dentist or dental hygienist seeking a compact license privilege, the applicant,
shall apply to their home state dental board for a letter stating that the applicant
is eligible for compact license privileges.
(e) The home state dental board shall determine the eligibility of an application for a
compact license privilege and shall issue a letter of approval or denial of the
application for a compact license privilege.
(f) The letter from the applicant’s home state dental board approving the application
shall be submitted to the member state dental board for the member state in
which the applicant proposes to practice, and shall include:
(1) The Compact application packet;
Page 13 of 22
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2483
(2) Authorization to seek access to the applicant’s repository documents;
(3) Any additional information that may be required by the proposed compact
license privilege state; and
(4) Any required fees.
The member state dental board shall review the application to confirm
compliance with the member state’s laws and regulations. Following such review,
if the member state dental board approves the application, it shall issue a compact
license privilege from the proposed member state to the applicant.
(g) Appeals of a denial of a compact license privilege application shall be filed with
the member state dental board making such determination, and shall be filed
within thirty (30) days of the days of the denial.
(h) A licensee holding a compact license privilege shall notify the commission within
ten (10) business days of any adverse action taken against a license held in a state
that is not a member state.
(i) A compact license privilege may be revoked, suspended, or limited by the issuing
member state dental board if at any time the licensee’s home state license is
revoked, suspended, or limited.
(j) The commission shall issue rules on the duration of a compact license privilege,
the application and renewal process for a compact license privilege, and any
application fees.
(k) Eligibility or ineligibility to receive a compact license privilege shall not limit the
ability of a licensee to seek a state license through the regular process outside of
the Compact.
Section 7. JURISDICTION OVER COMPACT LICENSE PRIVILEGE HOLDERS
(a) Each licensee holding a compact license privilege shall be subject to and comply
with the laws and regulations of the member state in which such licensee
practices under a compact license privilege.
Page 14 of 22
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2483
(b) Each licensee holding a compact license privilege shall be subject to the
jurisdiction and authority of the member state dental board of the state in which
such licensee practices, as if they held a license issued from such member state
dental board. Such compact license privilege holder shall be deemed a licensee of
the member state dental board for purposes of such board taking an adverse
action.
(c) Each licensee holding a compact license privilege shall list a current address with
the commission that shall serve as their official address of service.
(d) A licensee holding a compact license privilege may have an adverse action taken
against them by:
(1) The member state dental board of the member state in which they are
practicing with a compact license privilege;
(2) The licensee’s home state; or
(3) The state licensing authority of a state that is not a member state from
which the licensee holds a license.
(e) A home state may take an adverse action against the holder of a compact license
privilege, regardless of where the actions giving rise to the adverse action
occurred.
(f) Any member state in which the compact licensee holds a compact license
privilege may investigate an allegation of a violation of the laws and rules of the
practice of dentistry or dental hygiene in any other state where the compact
licensee holds a compact license privilege.
Section 8. FEES AND MILITARY WAIVER
(a) The commission shall issue rules regarding the use of the repository by each
holder of a compact license privilege.
(b) A member state dental board issuing a compact license privilege authorizing
practice in its state may impose a fee for a compact license privilege, for either
Page 15 of 22
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2483
initial issuance or any renewal.
(c) No compact fee shall be required of any active duty military member or their
spouse up to one (1) year after separation from the service. Each member state
issuing a compact license privilege may waive fees for active duty military
members and their spouse as required by each individual state statute.
(d) Active duty military may transfer military training records to the repository
without a fee.
Section 9. JOINT INVESTIGATIONS AND DISCIPLINARY ACTIONS
(a) Each member state shall name a point of contact for joint investigations between
member state dental boards.
(b) Member state dental boards may participate with other member state dental
boards in joint investigations of licensees that are subject to this compact.
(c) Member state dental boards may share investigative, litigation or other materials
in furtherance of any joint or individual investigation of a compact license
privilege holder.
(d) A subpoena issued by a member state or member state dental board shall be
enforceable in other member states as allowed by law.
(e) If a compact license privilege holder has an adverse action taken against them by
any member state dental board, the compact license privilege holder, licensee
shall automatically be subject to similar discipline by other member state dental
boards.
(f) If a compact license privilege holder has an adverse action taken against their
home state license, including being revoked, surrendered, or relinquished in lieu
of discipline or suspended, then automatically all other compact license privileges
shall be placed in the same status. The home state dental board shall notify the
commission and the commission shall issue a notice to all member state dental
boards of such adverse action.
Page 16 of 22
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2483
(g) If discipline or an adverse action is taken against a compact license privilege
holder in a member state, the member state board shall notify the commission
and the home state of the compact license privilege holder. The home state may
deem the action conclusive as a matter of law and fact and may:
(1) Impose the same or lesser sanction consistent with the home state’s laws; or
(2) Pursue separate actions against the compact license privilege holder under
its laws, regardless of the sanctions pursued by the member state dental
board.
Section 10. OTHER REQUESTS FOR INFORMATION FROM THE REPOSITORY
AND THE CLEARINGHOUSE
(a) Insurance companies and entities verifying documents for the purpose of licenses
extended to a dentist or dental hygienist may seek information from the
clearinghouse for public record documents;
(b) A dentist or dental hygienist may submit a request to the commission to allow any
hiring employer, entity, or insurance company to access documents from the
repository for the purposes of credentialing, licensing, or other privileges.
(c) The commission shall set a fee schedule for these services.
Section 11. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE COMMISSION
(a) The commission shall promulgate reasonable rules in order to effectively and
efficiently implement and achieve the purposes and administration of the
Compact. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event the commission exercises
its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond the scope of the purposes of
the Compact or the powers granted hereunder, then such an action by the
commission may be determined to be invalid and have no force or effect.
(b) Rules validly issued by the commission shall have the force of law in each
member state.
(c) Rules deemed appropriate for the operations of the commission shall be made
Page 17 of 22
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2483
pursuant to a rulemaking process that substantially conforms to the Model State
Administrative Procedure Act of 2010, and subsequent amendments thereto.
Section 12. OVERSIGHT OF THE COMPACT
(a) The executive, legislative, and judicial branches of state government in each
member state shall enforce the Compact and shall take all actions necessary and
appropriate to effectuate the Compact's purposes and intent to allow for expedited
licensure for the purpose of mobility. The provisions of the Compact and the
rules promulgated hereunder shall have standing as statutory law but shall not
override existing state authority to regulate the practice of dentistry and dental
hygiene.
(b) All courts may take judicial notice of the Compact and the rules in any judicial or
administrative proceeding in a member state pertaining to the subject matter of
the Compact which may affect the powers, responsibilities, or actions of the
commission.
(c) The commission shall be entitled to receive all service of process in any such
proceeding and shall have standing to intervene in the proceeding for all
purposes. Except where the commission has intervened, failure to provide service
of process to the commission shall render a judgment or order void as to the
commission, the Compact or promulgated rules.
Section 13. ENFORCEMENT AND DEFAULT PROCEDURES
(a) The commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall enforce the
provisions and rules of the Compact.
(b) The grounds for default under this Compact by a member state include, but are
not limited to, failure of a member state to perform such obligations or
responsibilities imposed upon it by the Compact or by the rules and bylaws of the
commission promulgated under the Compact.
(c) If the commission determines that a member state has defaulted in the
Page 18 of 22
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2483
performance of its obligations or responsibilities under the Compact, or the
bylaws or promulgated rules, the commission shall:
(1) Provide written notice to the defaulting state and other member states of the
nature of the default, the means of curing the default and any action taken
by the commission. The commission shall specify the conditions by which
the defaulting state must cure its default; and
(2) Provide remedial training and specific technical assistance regarding the
default.
(d) If the defaulting state fails to cure the default, the defaulting state shall be
terminated from the Compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the
commissioners and all rights, privileges and benefits conferred by the Compact
shall terminate on the effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not
relieve the offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period
of the default.
(e) Termination of membership in the Compact shall be imposed only after all other
means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to terminate
shall be given by the commission to the governor, the majority and minority
leaders of the defaulting state's legislature and each of the member states.
(f) The commission shall establish rules and procedures to address licensees and
compact license privilege holders that are materially impacted by the termination
of a member state or the withdrawal of a member state.
(g) The commission shall not bear any costs relating to any state that has been found
to be in default or which has been terminated from the Compact, unless otherwise
mutually agreed upon in writing between the commission and the defaulting
state.
(h) The defaulting state may appeal the action of the commission by petitioning the
state court where the commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party
Page 19 of 22
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2483
shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees.
(i) The commission shall not bear any costs relating to any state that has been found
to be in default or which has been terminated from the Compact, unless otherwise
mutually agreed upon in writing between the commission and the defaulting
state.
(j) The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the commission. The
commission may avail itself of any other remedies available under state law or the
regulation of a profession.
Section 14. DISPUTE RESOLUTION
(a) The commission shall attempt, upon the request of a member state dental board,
to resolve disputes which are subject to the compact and which may arise among
member state dental boards.
(b) The commission shall promulgate rules providing for both mediation and
voluntary binding dispute resolution, as appropriate.
Section 15. MEMBER STATES, EFFECTIVE DATE AND AMENDMENT
(a) Any state is eligible to become a member state of the Compact.
(b) The Compact shall become effective and binding upon legislative enactment of
the Compact into law by no less than five (5) states. Thereafter, it shall become
effective and binding on a state upon enactment of the Compact into law by that
state.
(c) The governors of nonmember states, or their designees, shall be invited to
participate in the activities of the commission on a nonvoting basis prior to
adoption of the Compact by all states.
(d) The commission may propose amendments to the Compact for enactment by the
member states. No amendment shall become effective and binding upon the
commission and the member states unless and until it is enacted into law by
unanimous consent of the member states.
Page 20 of 22
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2483
Section 16. WITHDRAWAL
(a) Once effective, the Compact shall continue in force and remain binding upon
each and every member state; provided, however, that a member state may
withdraw from the Compact after giving appropriate notice by specifically
repealing the statute which enacted the Compact into law.
(b) The licensee’s compact license privilege shall remain in effect for six (6) months
from the date of the member state dental board withdrawal.
(c) The withdrawing state shall immediately notify the chairperson of the
commission in writing upon the introduction of legislation repealing the Compact
by the withdrawing state, and upon the enactment of such legislation.
(d) The commission shall notify the other member states within sixty (60) days of its
receipt of notice provided under Section 16(c) of this Compact.
(e) Reinstatement following withdrawal of a member state shall occur upon the
withdrawing state reenacting the Compact or upon such later date as determined
by the commission.
(f) The commission shall issue rules to address the impact of the withdrawal of a
member state on licenses granted by other member states to dentists and dental
hygienists who designated the withdrawing member state as their home state.
Section 17. DISSOLUTION
(a) The Compact shall dissolve effective upon the date of the withdrawal or default of
the member state which reduces the membership in the Compact to one (1)
member state.
(b) Upon the dissolution of the Compact, the Compact shall become null and void
and shall be of no further force or effect, and the business and affairs of the
commission shall be concluded and surplus funds shall be distributed in
accordance with the bylaws.
Section 18. SEVERABILITY AND CONSTRUCTION
Page 21 of 22
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2483
(a) The provisions of the Compact shall be severable, and if any phrase, clause,
sentence, or provision is deemed unenforceable, the remaining provisions of the
Compact shall be enforceable.
(b) The provisions of the Compact shall be liberally construed to effectuate its
purposes.
Section 19. BINDING EFFECT OF COMPACT AND OTHER LAWS
(a) Nothing herein prevents the enforcement of any other law of a member state that
is not inconsistent with the Compact.
(b) All lawful actions of the commission, including all rules and bylaws promulgated
by the commission, shall be binding upon the member states.
(c) All agreements between the commission and the member states shall be binding
in accordance with their terms.
(d) In the event any provision of the Compact exceeds the constitutional limits
imposed on the legislature of any member state, such provision shall be
ineffective to the extent of the conflict with the constitutional provision in
question in that member state.
Section 20. RULES OF ORDER
The most current edition of the American Institute of Parliamentarians Standard Code
of Parliamentary Procedure shall be used for all meetings of the commission,
including its committees, in those situations not otherwise covered in the bylaws.
Page 22 of 22
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:04 PM Jacketed